Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-405
Legislative
Council; duties; investigations; studies.

It shall
be the duty of the council (1) to investigate and study the possibilities
for consolidation in state government for elimination of all unnecessary activities
and of all duplication in office personnel and equipment and of the coordination
of departmental activities or of methods of increasing efficiency and effecting
economies, (2) to investigate and study the possibilities of reforming the
system of local government with a view to simplifying the organization of
government, (3) to study the merit system as it relates to state and local
government personnel, (4) to cooperate with the administration in devising
means of enforcing the law and improving the effectiveness of administrative
methods, (5) to study and inquire into the financial administration of the
state government and the subdivisions thereof, the problems of taxation, including
assessment and collection of taxes, and the distribution of the tax burden,
and (6) to study and inquire into future planning of capital construction
of the state and its governmental agencies as to location and sites for expansion.

Laws 1937, c. 118, § 3, p. 422;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-503;

R.S.1943, § 50-405;

Laws 1969, c. 431, § 1, p. 1453;

Laws 1986, LB 996, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 75;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 17.